North Dakota, session 69, SB2135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 18-04-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The insurance commissioner shall transfer an amount of up to fifty thousandone hundred
twenty - five thousand dollars per biennium, as may be necessary, to the firefighters death
benefit fund for distribution under chapter 18-05.1.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 18-05.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
18-05.1-02. Payments from firefighters death benefit fund.
The insurance commissioner shall pay ten thousand twenty - five thousand dollars to a deceased
firefighter's survivor upon receipt of a request for payment and evidence of a line of duty death from the
fire chief or the fire chief's designee of a city fire department, rural fire department, or rural fire
protection district.

S. B. NO. 2135 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2135.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State